Utah statutes.
54-1-11.   Prohibited interests, relationships and actions by commissioners and employees.

(1)  No person employed as a commissioner or as personnel of the commission shall, while so employed:

(a)  Have any pecuniary interest, whether as the holder of stock or other securities, or otherwise have any conflict of interest with any public utility or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the commission;

(b)  Have any office, position or relationship, or be engaged in any business or avocation which interferes or is incompatible with the effective and objective fulfillment of the duties of office or employment with the commission;

(c)  Accept any gift, gratuity, emolument or employment from any public utility or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the commission or from any other officer, agent, or employee thereof; or

(d)  Solicit, suggest, request, or recommend, directly or indirectly, the appointment of any person or entity to any office or employment with any public utility or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission.

(2)  No officer, agent, attorney, or employee of any public utility shall directly or indirectly solicit, request, or recommend to the governor, any state senator, the commission, or the Division of Public Utilities the appointment of any person as a commissioner or as executive director of the commission, or the appointment of any person to any commission staff position.

